California, session 20252026, SB1300.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12802.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:12802.6. The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency may appoint an individual or identify one or more University of California centers to oversee and administer a Secretariat for International Climate Coordination and Cooperation to assist the legislative and executive branches’ engagement in international climate policy, including, but not limited to, the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change Conference of Parties processes and the state’s existing and future international climate change memoranda of understanding, technical cooperation agreements, and other voluntary frameworks. SECTION 1.Section 38531 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:38531.(a)(1)The state board shall make available, and update at least annually, on its internet website the emissions of greenhouse gases and criteria pollutants for each facility that reports to the state board pursuant to Section 38530. The data shall be displayed in a manner that illustrates the changes in emissions levels over time.(2)No later than January 1, 2018, the state board shall add toxic air contaminant emissions to the information made available pursuant to paragraph (1).(3)The criteria pollutant and toxic air contaminant emissions data for stationary sources shall be based on data provided to the state board by air pollution control and air quality management districts collected pursuant to Section 39607 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44340) of Part 6 of Division 26.(b)At least once a year at a hearing of the Joint Legislative Committee on Climate Change Policies, the state board shall present an informational report on topics related to the scoping plan pursuant to Sections 38561 and 38562.7, as directed by the joint committee. The report shall include a discussion of the regulatory requirements, initiatives, international agreements on the topic of climate change or clean technology innovation, and other programs that influence the implementation of the scoping plan. The report also may include recommendations from the state board for legislative action and consideration.